Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 TEACHER SALARY SUPPLEMENT DISTRICT COST PER PUPIL 2 Section 1. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (3), subparagraph divisions (b) and (c), Code 4 2025, are amended to read as follows: 5 (b) The department of management shall categorize all 6 school districts into not more than ten tiers according to each 7 school districtâs actual enrollment. Each tier established 8 by the department of management containing a school district 9 with an actual enrollment above three thousand five hundred 10 pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number 11 of school districts as other tiers containing school districts 12 with an actual enrollment of more than three thousand five 13 hundred pupils. Each tier established by the department 14 of management containing a school district with an actual 15 enrollment equal to or less than three thousand five hundred 16 pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number 17 of school districts as other tiers containing school districts 18 with an actual enrollment equal to or less than three thousand 19 five hundred pupils. 20 (c) (b) (i) To support school districts with meeting 21 the minimum teacher salary requirements under chapter 284, 22 including the minimum teacher starting salary requirement 23 of fifty thousand dollars ; and the minimum teacher salary 24 requirement for full-time teachers with, as of July 1, 2025, at 25 least twelve years of experience of sixty-two thousand dollars 26 under chapter 284 ; and the minimum teacher salary requirement 27 for teachers with at least twelve years of experience, who 28 have had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered 29 employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who have returned 30 to covered employment with a covered employer pursuant to 31 chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256, of 32 fifty thousand dollars, and other costs associated with such 33 salary requirements, as identified in subparagraph subdivision 34 (ii) including costs associated with the employerâs share of 35 -1- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 1/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ contributions to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 1 and the employerâs share of the tax imposed by the federal 2 Insurance Contributions Act , the department of management 3 shall calculate and assign to all school districts in a tier 4 established under subparagraph division (b), a teacher salary 5 supplement district cost per pupil in an amount based in part 6 on the average cost to school districts within the tier to meet 7 the requirements , plus an amount equal to the teacher salary 8 supplement supplemental state aid amount for the budget year . 9 (ii) If, however, a school districtâs total teacher 10 salary supplement district cost under paragraph âcâ , as 11 calculated using the teacher salary supplement district cost 12 per pupil assigned to the school districtâs applicable tier, 13 is insufficient to comply with the applicable minimum teacher 14 salary requirements of the school district, including costs 15 associated with the employerâs share of contributions to the 16 Iowa public employeesâ retirement system and the employerâs 17 share of the tax imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions 18 Act , the department of management shall set the school 19 districtâs teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil 20 at an amount necessary to meet the districtâs minimum salary 21 requirements and associated costs. If, however, a school 22 district reported a teacherâs years of experience incorrectly 23 on the fall 2023 basic educational data survey compared to the 24 fall 2024 basic educational data survey, and the difference 25 would have resulted in an additional per pupil amount for 26 the budget year beginning July 1, 2024, the department of 27 management shall increase the teacher salary supplement 28 district cost per pupil for the budget year beginning July 1, 29 2025, by the difference between the teacher salary supplement 30 district cost per pupil that would have been calculated if not 31 for the incorrect reporting and the teacher salary supplement 32 district cost per pupil actually calculated. 33 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 34 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 35 -2- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 2/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ DIVISION II 1 TEACHER PREPARATION 2 Sec. 3. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 3 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) (a) Require Except as described in subparagraph 5 division (b), require that each student admitted to an approved 6 practitioner preparation program participate in pre-student 7 teaching field experiences that include both observation and 8 participation in teaching activities in a variety of school 9 settings. 10 (a) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students 11 participating in an initial teacher preparation program shall 12 comprise a total of at least eighty hours in duration, at least 13 ten hours of which shall occur prior to a studentâs acceptance 14 in an approved practitioner preparation program. 15 (b) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students 16 participating in a teacher intern preparation program shall may 17 comprise a total of at least fifty hours in duration. 18 Sec. 4. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 19 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), subparagraph 20 subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 21 (i) The If the student has prior work experience as a 22 substitute teacher, the board of educational examiners has 23 issued a substitute license , or substitute authorization , or a 24 para-educator certificate to the student. 25 Sec. 5. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 26 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), subparagraph 27 subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 28 subparagraph subdivision. 29 Sec. 6. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph m, 30 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 31 subparagraph. 32 DIVISION III 33 OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT 34 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 282.35 Children requiring special 35 -3- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 3/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ education ââ out-of-state placement. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âChildâ means an individual who is under the age of 3 eighteen years, or an individual who is under the age of 4 twenty-one and is a full-time student, to whom all of the 5 following criteria apply: 6 (1) The individual is eligible for health care benefits 7 under chapter 249A. 8 (2) The individualâs health care coordination and 9 intervention team determines, pursuant to section 249A.4A, 10 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (1), that the 11 placement of the individual in an out-of-state facility, or 12 placement of the individual with an out-of-state provider, is 13 necessary for the individual to realize the full benefits of 14 chapter 249A. 15 (3) The director of the department of health and human 16 services certifies that the placement of the individual in an 17 out-of-state facility, or placement of the individual with an 18 out-of-state provider, is necessary to prevent the filing of a 19 petition under chapter 232 related to the individual. 20 (4) The director of the department of education determines 21 that the placement of the individual in an out-of-state 22 facility, or placement of the individual with an out-of-state 23 provider, would provide to the individual the education 24 required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted pursuant to 25 chapter 256B. 26 (5) The individual is and remains a resident of this state. 27 b. âDistrict of residenceâ means the school district in 28 which the parent or legal guardian of the child resides or the 29 district in which the district court is located if the district 30 court is the guardian of the child. 31 c. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 282.1, 32 subsection 2. 33 2. A childâs district of residence may place the child in 34 an out-of-state facility or with an out-of-state provider for 35 -4- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 4/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ purposes of providing the child with the education required 1 under chapter 256B, subject to the terms of an agreement 2 between the childâs district of residence and the facility or 3 provider. The agreement shall satisfy all of the following 4 requirements: 5 a. The agreement must require the facility or provider to 6 provide periodic invoices to the childâs district of residence 7 that describes the services provided to the child and the cost 8 associated with such services. 9 b. The agreement must condition the childâs district of 10 residenceâs payment of the invoice described in paragraph 11 âaâ upon the facility or provider providing to the child the 12 education required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted 13 pursuant to chapter 256B. 14 3. a. A childâs district of residence is not financially 15 responsible for the services provided by an out-of-state 16 facility or an out-of-state provider to a child unless the 17 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provides notice 18 to the childâs district of residence that the child may be 19 subject to this section and the childâs district of residence 20 enters into an agreement with the out-of-state facility 21 or out-of-state provider that satisfies the requirements 22 established in subsection 2. 23 b. By August 1 following the school year in which the 24 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided 25 services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into under 26 subsection 2, the childâs district of residence may submit 27 an accounting to the department of education that describes 28 the cost of the services provided by the facility or provider 29 during such school year. 30 c. By August 15 following the school year in which the 31 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided 32 services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into 33 under subsection 2, the department of education shall review 34 and either approve or modify the accounting submitted pursuant 35 -5- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 5/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ to paragraph âbâ and make payment to the childâs district of 1 residence toward the school year in which the cost of the 2 services was incurred. The payment amount is the difference 3 between the amount of the actual costs as reflected in the 4 district of residenceâs accounting less the amount generated by 5 the weighting for the provision of services. 6 d. Any amounts paid by the department of education to school 7 districts in this state pursuant to paragraph âcâ shall be 8 deducted on a monthly basis from the state foundation aid paid 9 under section 257.16 to all school districts in the state in 10 the school year following the school year in which the services 11 were provided. The portion of the total amount paid by the 12 department of education to a district that shall be deducted 13 from the state foundation aid paid to the district shall be the 14 same as the ratio that the budget enrollment for the budget 15 year of the district bears to the total budget enrollment in 16 the state for that budget year. 17 4. The department of education shall promptly and summarily 18 resolve any disputes between school districts related to the 19 financial responsibility of such school districts under this 20 section. 21 DIVISION IV 22 ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 23 Sec. 8. Section 84A.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 24 by striking the subsection. 25 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 256.27 Online state job posting 26 system. 27 1. The department shall provide for the operation of an 28 online state job posting system. The system shall be designed 29 and implemented for the online posting of job openings offered 30 by school districts, charter schools, area education agencies, 31 the department, and accredited nonpublic schools. The system 32 shall be accessible via the departmentâs internet site. The 33 system shall include a mechanism for the electronic submission 34 of job openings for posting on the system as provided in 35 -6- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 6/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ subsection 2. The system and each job posting on the system 1 shall include a statement that an employer submitting a job 2 opening for posting on the system will not discriminate in 3 hiring on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, 4 gender, age, physical disability, sexual orientation, gender 5 identity, religion, marital status, or status as a veteran. 6 The department may contract for, or partner with another entity 7 for, the use of an existing internet site to operate the online 8 state job posting system if the existing internet site is more 9 effective and economical than the departmentâs internet site. 10 2. A school district, charter school, or area education 11 agency shall submit all of its job openings to the department 12 for posting on the system and shall keep and maintain all 13 unfilled job openings on the system. The department shall post 14 all of its job openings on the system. An accredited nonpublic 15 school may submit job openings to the department for posting 16 on the system. 17 3. This section shall not be construed to do any of the 18 following: 19 a. Prohibit any employer from advertising job openings and 20 recruiting employees independently of the system. 21 b. Prohibit any employer from using another method of 22 advertising job openings or another applicant tracking system 23 in addition to the system. 24 c. Provide the department with any regulatory authority in 25 the hiring process or hiring decisions of any employer other 26 than the department. 27 DIVISION V 28 TEACHER COMPENSATION 29 Sec. 10. Section 284.15, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 32 subsequent fiscal year, the salary for a career teacher, model 33 teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, who holds a valid 34 license issued under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3 , and 35 -7- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 7/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, shall be at 1 least sixty-two thousand dollars. 2 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a 4 career teacher, model teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, 5 who holds a valid license issued under chapter 256, subchapter 6 VII, part 3, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, 7 who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a 8 covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who has 9 returned to covered employment with a covered employer pursuant 10 to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256, shall 11 be paid not less than fifty thousand dollars. 12 Sec. 11. Section 284.16, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 15 each subsequent fiscal year, a career teacher, instructional 16 coach, curriculum and professional development leader, or model 17 teacher, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, 18 shall be paid not less than sixty-two thousand dollars. 19 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal 20 year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal 21 year, a career teacher, instructional coach, curriculum and 22 professional development leader, or model teacher, who has been 23 a teacher for at least twelve years, who has had a bona fide 24 retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided 25 in section 97B.52A, and who has returned to covered employment 26 with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher 27 licensed under chapter 256, shall be paid not less than fifty 28 thousand dollars. 29 Sec. 12. Section 284.17, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 30 2025, is amended to read as follows: 31 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 32 subsequent fiscal year, the minimum salary of fifty thousand 33 dollars for a full-time teacher who has less than twelve years 34 of teaching experience and a minimum salary of sixty-two 35 -8- LSB 1126XL (12) 91 jda/jh 8/ 13 S.F. _____ H.F. _____ thousand dollars for a full-time teacher who has at least 1 twelve years of teaching experience. 2 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year 3 beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a 4 minimum salary of fifty thousand dollars for a full-time 5 teacher who has at least twelve years of teaching experience, 6 who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a 7 covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who has 8 returned to covered employment with a covered employer pursuant 9 to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256. 10